Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-161
Comprehensive development plans; Governor's Policy Research Office; assist in preparation; when.

The Governor's Policy Research Office shall not contract with or provide assistance to any municipality or county to prepare comprehensive development plans or land-use regulatory proposals, unless such assistance shall first be requested in writing by the municipality or county.

Laws 1978, LB 186, § 14;

Laws 1979, LB 412, § 30.